inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_m.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niminongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: giminongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: niminongwaamimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: giminongwaamimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: giminongwaamim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: minongwaam
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: minongwaamoog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: minongwaamoon
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [minongwaamoon,minongwaamoo']
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: minongwaamim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [niminongwaanziin,niminongwaanzii]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [giminongwaanziin,giminongwaanzii]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: niminongwaanziimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: giminongwaanziimin
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: giminongwaanziim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [minongwaanziin,minongwaanzii]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: minongwaanziiwag
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: minongwaanziiwan
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [minongwaanziiwan,minongwaanziiwa']
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: minongwaanziim
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: niminongwaaminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: giminongwaaminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: niminongwaamiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: giminongwaamiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: giminongwaamimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaamooban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [minongwaamoobaniig,minongwaamoobaneg]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [minongwaamoobaniin,minongwaamoobanen]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [minongwaamoobaniin,minongwaamoobanen]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: minongwaamimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: niminongwaanziinaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: giminongwaanziinaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: niminongwaanziiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: giminongwaanziiminaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: giminongwaanziimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaanziiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [minongwaanziibaniig,minongwaanziibaneg]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [minongwaanziibaniin,minongwaanziibanen]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [minongwaanziibaniin,minongwaanziibanen]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: minongwaanziimwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: niminongwaaminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: giminongwaaminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: niminongwaamiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: giminongwaamiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: giminongwaamimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: [minongwaamowidog,minongwaamodog]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: [minongwaamowidogenag ,minongwaamodogenag]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: [minongwaamowidogenan ,minongwaamodogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [minongwaamowidogenan ,minongwaamodogenan]
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: minongwaamimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: niminongwaanziinaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: giminongwaanziinaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: niminongwaanziiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: giminongwaanziiminaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: giminongwaanziimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: minongwaanziidog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: minongwaanziidogenag
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: minongwaanziidogenan
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [minongwaanziidogenan,minongwaanziidogena']
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: minongwaanziimwaadog
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaamogoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: minongwaamogwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: minongwaaminigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaanziigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: minongwaanziigwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: minongwaanziinigoban
